Wisconsin, session 2025, AB122.
do enact as follows:AB122,11Section 1. 118.51 (3m) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB122,2,92118.51 (3m) (b) 4. The place of residence of the pupil’s parent or guardian and 3of the pupil has changed as a result of military orders. An application made on the 4basis of this criteria is not valid unless the nonresident school board receives the 5application no later than 30 90 days after the date on which the military orders 6changing the place of residence were issued. For purposes of this subdivision, a 7military order includes an order from any branch of the U.S. armed forces, a reserve 8component of the U.S. armed forces, the state defense force, or the national guard of 9any state.AB122,210Section 2. Initial applicability.AB122,2,1211(1) This act first applies to applications under s. 118.51 (3m) that are received 12on the effective date of this subsection.AB122,2,1313